Indiana, session 2026, SB176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-22-31.5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. Except as specifically prohibited by this chapter
and subject to IC 35-47-11.1 and IC 36-7-4.2, a local unit of
government may regulate the location, use, operation, safety, and
construction of a shooting range.
SECTION 2. IC 14-22-31.5-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The maintenance, repair,
renovation, modernization, or expansion of buildings, structures,
or facilities used in connection with a shooting range, including
improvements to safety, security accessibility, or environmental
controls, is a continuation of a permitted use and may not be
treated by a local unit of government as:
(1) an expansion of a nonconforming use; or
(2) a basis to deny, delay, or condition approval of any permit
that is otherwise required under applicable building codes or
safety regulations.
(b) A local unit of government shall review and act upon any
application for a permit described in subsection (a) using the same
objective standards and procedures that apply to similarly situated
SEA 176 — CC 1

2
commercial, industrial, or agricultural properties, without regard
to the:
(1) type of goods or services offered by the shooting range; or
(2) status of the property with respect to annexation.
(c) A local unit of government may not condition, explicitly or
implicitly, the approval, issuance, or timely processing of a permit
described in subsection (a) on the:
(1) owner's or operator's consent to annexation by a
municipality (as defined in IC 36-1-2-11); or
(2) waiver of any right granted to the owner or operator
under this chapter or any other law.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a local unit of government
from enforcing generally applicable building, fire, or safety codes
that are:
(1) neutral and of general applicability; and
(2) not adopted or applied for the purpose of restricting,
hindering, or causing the closure of a shooting range.
SECTION 3. IC 36-7-4.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 4.2. Permitted Uses; Indoor Shooting Ranges; Sporting
Goods Stores
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 36-1-2 and IC 36-7-1 apply
throughout this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) This chapter does not apply to property within:
(1) a historic area or historic zoning district created under:
(A) IC 36-7-11;
(B) IC 36-7-11.1;
(C) IC 36-7-11.2; or
(D) IC 36-7-11.3;
(2) a flood plain (as defined in IC 14-8-2-99); or
(3) subject to subsection (b), an area zoned for commercial use
that authorizes mixed use residential projects.
(b) Subsection (a)(3) does not include areas that contain a
shooting range (as defined in IC 14-22-31.5-3) that:
(1) was lawfully established and in operation before July 1,
2026;
(2) was located on property zoned for commercial use on or
before July 1, 2026; and
(3) seeks to develop an indoor shooting range after June 30,
2026, within the geographic boundaries of the shooting range
as it existed on July 1, 2026.
SEA 176 — CC 1

3
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "indoor shooting range" means
a fully enclosed facility designed and operated for the discharge of
firearms, equipped with a bullet resistant backstop, ventilation
system, and sound attenuation measures to prevent the escape of
projectiles, excessive noise, or airborne contaminants.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "mixed use residential" means a
development project that provides within a shared building or
development area:
(1) residential uses, including multiple dwelling units; and
(2) nonresidential uses that:
(A) comprise less than fifty percent (50%) of the total
square footage of the development; and
(B) are restricted to the first floor of any building
consisting of at least two (2) stories.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "permitted use" means a use that
is approved by a unit in a zoning district without the requirement
of:
(1) a public hearing;
(2) a variance, special exception, contingent use, or
conditional use; or
(3) other discretionary zoning action, other than a
determination that a site plan conforms with applicable
zoning regulations.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "retail sporting goods store"
means a commercial retail store that is primarily engaged in
retailing new sporting goods classified under the North American
Industry Classification Code 451110 (sporting goods stores),
including items such as:
(1) bicycles and bicycle parts;
(2) camping equipment;
(3) exercise and fitness equipment;
(4) athletic uniforms;
(5) specialty sports footwear;
(6) firearms; and
(7) other sporting goods, equipment, and accessories.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "will-serve letter" means a
written document:
(1) issued by a water and sewer service provider to an owner
or developer of a project or dwelling; and
(2) that states the provider is able and willing to provide
water and sewer service to the project or dwelling subject to
the conditions, if any, set forth in the document.
SEA 176 — CC 1

4
Sec. 8. (a) Notwithstanding IC 36-7-4 or any other law, the
following are permitted uses:
(1) A retail sporting goods store within an area zoned for
commercial use under section 9 of this chapter.
(2) An indoor shooting range within an area zoned for
commercial, industrial, or agricultural use under section 10
of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 36-7-4 or any other law, a unit may not
adopt or enforce restrictions regarding indoor shooting ranges or
retail sporting goods stores that violate this chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) If a property is zoned for commercial use, a retail
sporting goods store is a permitted use on each lot or parcel.
(b) A unit may require:
(1) a will-serve letter for a retail sporting goods store under
subsection (a); and
(2) an application fee.
Sec. 10. (a) If a property is zoned for commercial, industrial, or
agricultural use, an indoor shooting range is permitted on any lot
or parcel if the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The walls, ceilings, floors, and backstops must be
constructed with materials capable of containing all
projectiles fired within the facility.
(2) Reasonable effort is made in the design, construction, and
maintenance of the indoor shooting range to limit noise that
could significantly impact adjacent properties.
(b) A unit may require:
(1) a will-serve letter for an indoor shooting range under
subsection (a); and
(2) an application fee.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the scope
of federal and state law governing firearm safety, environmental
controls, and occupational health.
Sec. 11. A zoning ordinance adopted before July 1, 2026, is void
to the extent the ordinance conflicts with this chapter. However,
this chapter does not apply to or affect any application for a permit
under IC 36-7-4 submitted to a unit before July 1, 2026.
SEA 176 — CC 1

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 176 — CC 1